Utah statutes.
58-26a-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Utah Board of Accountancy consisting of four licensed certified public accountants and one member of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and shall serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer of an administrative proceeding concerning the complaint.

